California, session 20252026, AB1364.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7583.6 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7583.6. (a) Each An applicant for a security guard registration shall complete a course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force as a condition for the issuance of the registration. A course provider authorized to provide the training pursuant to Section 7583.7 shall issue a certificate of completion to the person upon satisfactory completion of the training. The course provider shall conduct the training in accordance with Section 7583.7 and any applicable regulations adopted by the bureau.(b) Except for a registrant who has completed the course of training required by Section 7583.45, a security guard registrant shall complete not less than 32 hours of training in security officer skills within six months from the date an initial registration is issued. A security guard registrant shall complete 16 of the 32 hours within 30 days from the date the registration is issued.(c) A course provider, which is authorized to provide the training required by subdivision (b) pursuant to subdivision (f), shall issue a certificate of completion to a registrant after the registrant completes each training course. The course provider shall conduct the trainings in accordance with any applicable regulations adopted by the bureau subject to this chapter.(d) (1) A registrant who is unable to provide their employing licensee the certificate of satisfactory completion of the training required by subdivision (a) shall complete the training within six months of the registrant’s employment date.(2) A registrant who is unable to provide their employing licensee the certificate of satisfactory completion of the training required by subdivision (b) shall complete 16 hours of the training within 30 days of the registrant’s employment date and shall complete the 16 remaining hours within six months of the registrant’s employment date.(e) A registrant shall annually complete eight hours of specifically dedicated review or practice of security officer skills prescribed in this section, Section 7583.7, or by the bureau by regulation.(f) The trainings specified in this section may be administered, tested, and certified by one of the following:(1) Any licensee.(2) Any training facility certified pursuant to this chapter.(3) Any organization or school approved by the bureau. The bureau shall approve any instructor of an organization or school who will administer the trainings specified in this section to ensure that the organization or school complies with the requirements of this chapter, as well as any applicable regulations.(g) (1) A registrant shall maintain the certificate of completion the registrant received for each training course prescribed in this section until the registration expires or has been canceled. The registrant shall provide the records to the bureau upon request.(2) A licensee shall maintain at the principal place of business or branch office a record for each of its registrant employees verifying completion of the trainings required by this section for the duration of the registrant’s employment. The records shall be available for inspection by the bureau upon request.(h) This section does not apply to a peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code who has successfully completed a course of study in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training or a federal qualified law enforcement officer, as defined in Section 926B of Title 18 of the United States Code, who has successfully completed a course of study in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force.(i) This section does not apply to armored vehicle guards.(j) (1) The bureau shall develop and approve by regulation a standard course and curriculum for the skills trainings required by this section to promote and protect the safety of persons and the security of property.(2) The bureau shall develop an outline for the course and curriculum described in paragraph (1) in consultation with the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.(k) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.